Hawaii, session 2025, HB1107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that most rural communities in the State have fewer health care resources compared to communities on Oahu, including access to advanced levels of trauma care, medical specialists, and sub-specialists.  This puts patients in these areas at greater risk of poor outcomes for serious medical conditions such as heart attack, stroke, and traumatic bodily injuries. The legislature further finds that the existing aeromedical services system is overburdened.  The State is currently served by only one statewide aeromedical provider, for which there are few viable and cost-effective alternatives in the event of a grounding, for example, due to maintenance issues or crew availability.  Emergency aeromedical services are not available for many patients in rural counties and areas. The legislature further finds that one model to improve emergency aeromedical services could be based on the county of Maui's medevac service model.  Act 2, Special Session Laws of Hawaii 2003, appropriated general funds for the provision of emergency aeromedical helicopter services for the county of Maui. Act 213, Session Laws of Hawaii 2007, appropriated general funds for a replacement helicopter for the county of Maui aeromedical emergency medical services program.  The department of health cost-shares a helicopter with the county of Maui and contracts with a private entity to provide staff and operate the helicopter for emergency aeromedical services. The legislature further finds that the department of health has the authority to establish emergency aeromedical services but lacks sufficient resources to implement the Maui model in other rural counties.  Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to increase the availability of emergency aeromedical services. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $__________ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2027-2028 to assist the counties, other than the county of Kalawao, to increase access to emergency aeromedical services, to be allocated as follows: (1)  $__________ to the city and county of Honolulu; (2)  $__________ to the county of Maui; (3)  $__________ to the county of Hawaii; and (4)  $__________ to the county of Kauai. The sums appropriated shall be expended by each county for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $__________ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2027-2028 to be deposited into the emergency medical services special fund. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the emergency medical services special fund the sum of $__________ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2027-2028 for the establishment of and operating expenses for emergency aeromedical services, including the procurement of helicopters. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST